src/fst/stems/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in GERMAN language are bound to beginning of other words.

LEXICON PREF-V_
#;

LEXICON Prefixes
!nounprefix-     Nouns   ;
!verbprefix-     Verbs   ;

!!##
ab+Pref/ab:0ab PREF-V_ ;
abhande+Pref/abhande:0abhande PREF-V_ ;
an+Pref/an:0an PREF-V_ ;
auf+Pref/auf:0auf PREF-V_ ;
aus+Pref/aus:0aus PREF-V_ ;
auseinander+Pref/auseinander:0auseinander PREF-V_ ;
bei+Pref/bei:0bei PREF-V_ ;
dabei+Pref/dabei:0dabei PREF-V_ ;
daher+Pref/daher:0daher PREF-V_ ;
dahin+Pref/dahin:0dahin PREF-V_ ;
daneben+Pref/daneben:0daneben PREF-V_ ;
dar+Pref/dar:0dar PREF-V_ ;
daran+Pref/daran:0daran PREF-V_ ;
darauf+Pref/darauf:0darauf PREF-V_ ;
davon+Pref/davon:0davon PREF-V_ ;
dazwischen+Pref/dazwischen:0dazwischen PREF-V_ ;
drauf+Pref/drauf:0drauf PREF-V_ ;
durch+Pref/durch:0durch PREF-V_ ;
durcheinander+Pref/durcheinander:0durcheinander PREF-V_ ;
ein+Pref/ein:0ein PREF-V_ ;
einher+Pref/einher:0einher PREF-V_ ;
empor+Pref/empor:0empor PREF-V_ ;
entgegen+Pref/entgegen:0entgegen PREF-V_ ;
entlang+Pref/entlang:0entlang PREF-V_ ;
entzwei+Pref/entzwei:0entzwei PREF-V_ ;
fehl+Pref/fehl:0fehl PREF-V_ ;
fertig+Pref/fertig:0fertig PREF-V_ ;
fort+Pref/fort:0fort PREF-V_ ;
fremd+Pref/fremd:0fremd PREF-V_ ;
gut+Pref/gut:0gut PREF-V_ ;
heim+Pref/heim:0heim PREF-V_ ;
her+Pref/her:0her PREF-V_ ;
herab+Pref/herab:0herab PREF-V_ ;
heran+Pref/heran:0heran PREF-V_ ;
herauf+Pref/herauf:0herauf PREF-V_ ;
heraus+Pref/heraus:0heraus PREF-V_ ;
herbei+Pref/herbei:0herbei PREF-V_ ;
herein+Pref/herein:0herein PREF-V_ ;
hernieder+Pref/hernieder:0hernieder PREF-V_ ;
herum+Pref/herum:0herum PREF-V_ ;
herunter+Pref/herunter:0herunter PREF-V_ ;
hervor+Pref/hervor:0hervor PREF-V_ ;
herzu+Pref/herzu:0herzu PREF-V_ ;
herüber+Pref/herüber:0herüber PREF-V_ ;
hin+Pref/hin:0hin PREF-V_ ;
hinab+Pref/hinab:0hinab PREF-V_ ;
hinan+Pref/hinan:0hinan PREF-V_ ;
hinauf+Pref/hinauf:0hinauf PREF-V_ ;
hinaus+Pref/hinaus:0hinaus PREF-V_ ;
hinein+Pref/hinein:0hinein PREF-V_ ;
hinfort+Pref/hinfort:0hinfort PREF-V_ ;
hinter+Pref/hinter:0hinter PREF-V_ ;
hinunter+Pref/hinunter:0hinunter PREF-V_ ;
hinweg+Pref/hinweg:0hinweg PREF-V_ ;
hinzu+Pref/hinzu:0hinzu PREF-V_ ;
hinüber+Pref/hinüber:0hinüber PREF-V_ ;
hoch+Pref/hoch:0hoch PREF-V_ ;
irr+Pref/irr:0irr PREF-V_ ;
kaputt+Pref/kaputt:0kaputt PREF-V_ ;
klar+Pref/klar:0klar PREF-V_ ;
lang+Pref/lang:0lang PREF-V_ ;
los+Pref/los:0los PREF-V_ ;
längs+Pref/längs:0längs PREF-V_ ;
mit+Pref/mit:0mit PREF-V_ ;
nach+Pref/nach:0nach PREF-V_ ;
nahe+Pref/nahe:0nahe PREF-V_ ;
nieder+Pref/nieder:0nieder PREF-V_ ;
näher+Pref/näher:0näher PREF-V_ ;
ran+Pref/ran:0ran PREF-V_ ;
rauf+Pref/rauf:0rauf PREF-V_ ;
raus+Pref/raus:0raus PREF-V_ ;
rein+Pref/rein:0rein PREF-V_ ;
rum+Pref/rum:0rum PREF-V_ ;
runter+Pref/runter:0runter PREF-V_ ;
rüber+Pref/rüber:0rüber PREF-V_ ;
schief+Pref/schief:0schief PREF-V_ ;
tot+Pref/tot:0tot PREF-V_ ;
um+Pref/um:0um PREF-V_ ;
unter+Pref/unter:0unter PREF-V_ ;
voll+Pref/voll:0voll PREF-V_ ;
vonstatten+Pref/vonstatten:0vonstatten PREF-V_ ;
vor+Pref/vor:0vor PREF-V_ ;
voran+Pref/voran:0voran PREF-V_ ;
voraus+Pref/voraus:0voraus PREF-V_ ;
vorbei+Pref/vorbei:0vorbei PREF-V_ ;
vorwärts+Pref/vorwärts:0vorwärts PREF-V_ ;
vorüber+Pref/vorüber:0vorüber PREF-V_ ;
weg+Pref/weg:0weg PREF-V_ ;
weiter+Pref/weiter:0weiter PREF-V_ ;
wieder+Pref/wieder:0wieder PREF-V_ ;
zu+Pref/zu:0zu PREF-V_ ;
zugrunde+Pref/zugrunde:0zugrunde PREF-V_ ;
zurecht+Pref/zurecht:0zurecht PREF-V_ ;
zurück+Pref/zurück:0zurück PREF-V_ ;
zusammen+Pref/zusammen:0zusammen PREF-V_ ;
zustande+Pref/zustande:0zustande PREF-V_ ;
zuvor+Pref/zuvor:0zuvor PREF-V_ ;
über+Pref/über:0über PREF-V_ ;
überein+Pref/überein:0überein PREF-V_ ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
